Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-135
Drainage ditches; petition to clean and place in efficient condition.

In any county wherein a drainage ditch has been constructed under the provisions of sections 31-101 to 31-134, or by any drainage district which shall have been dissolved, a petition may be filed with the county clerk, signed by at least twenty-five percent of the landowners benefited by any such ditch, praying that the county board may cause such ditch to be cleared and placed in efficient condition and the cost thereof apportioned equitably.

Laws 1911, c. 141, § 1, p. 465;

R.S.1913, § 1752;

C.S.1922, § 1699;

Laws 1929, c. 130, § 2, p. 481;

C.S.1929, § 31-135;

R.S.1943, § 31-135;

Laws 1949, c. 79, § 1, p. 212.